Utah statutes.
34A-2-905.   Rulemaking authority -- Rebuttable presumption.

(1)  The Labor Commission has authority to establish rules necessary for the purposes of this part.

(2)  The presumption provided by this part is a rebuttable presumption.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 243, 2005 General Session

